District of Columbia statutes.
8-1537

Rules; enforcement.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

Civil fines and penalties may be imposed as sanctions for an infraction of the provisions of this chapter or any rules issued under the authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.] (“Civil Infractions Act”). Enforcement and adjudication of an infraction shall be pursuant to the Civil Infractions Act.

(c)

In addition to the enforcement authority provided to the Mayor under the Civil Infractions Act, the Mayor may seek injunctive relief or other appropriate remedy in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

(d)

(1)

For the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter, or any rule issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor may, upon the presentation of appropriate credentials to the owner, operator, or agent in charge, enter upon any public or private land in a reasonable and lawful manner during normal business hours for the purpose of sampling, inspection, and observation.

(2)

If denied access to any place while carrying out the activities described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Mayor may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant.

Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-142, § 407, 61 DCR 8045
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 6172(f), 62 DCR 10905
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 added (d).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6172(f) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).